Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska66-1512
Release, defined.

Release shall mean any spilling, leaking, emitting, discharging, escaping, leaching, or disposing of petroleum from a tank or any overfilling of a tank into ground water, surface water, surface soils, or subsurface soils whether occurring before, on, or after May 27, 1989.

Laws 1989, LB 289, § 12;

Laws 1991, LB 409, § 5.